Florida, session 2026, SB102.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSection 28.2225, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 17 Reviserâs note.âThe cited section, which relates to a pilot 18 program for title fraud prevention through identity 19 verification, was repealed pursuant to its own terms, 20 effective July 1, 2025. 21 Section 2.âSection 39.4093, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 22 Reviserâs note.âThe cited section, which relates to the Task 23 Force on the Monitoring of Children in Out-of-Home Care, 24 was repealed pursuant to its own terms, effective June 30, 25 2025. 26 Section 3.âParagraph (d) of subsection (4) of section 27 112.061, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 28 Reviserâs note.âThe cited paragraph, which relates to an 29 official headquarters for a Lieutenant Governor for conduct 30 of state business, expired pursuant to its own terms, 31 effective July 1, 2025. 32 Section 4.âSection 250.245, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 33 Reviserâs note.âThe cited section, which relates to the Florida 34 National Guard Joint Enlistment Enhancement Program, 35 expired pursuant to its own terms, effective July 1, 2025. 36 Section 5.âSection 288.8165, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 37 Reviserâs note.âThe cited section, which relates to citizen 38 support organizations to provide assistance, funding, and 39 promotional support for the intergovernmental programs of 40 the Department of State, was repealed pursuant to its own 41 terms, effective October 1, 2025. 42 Section 6.âSection 316.5501, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 43 Reviserâs note.âThe cited section, which relates to a permitting 44 program for combination truck tractor, semitrailer, and 45 trailer combination coupled as a single unit subject to 46 certain requirements, automatically expired pursuant to its 47 own terms, effective January 1, 2025, unless reauthorized 48 by the Legislature; the program was not reauthorized. 49 Section 7.âSubsection (4) of section 320.08053, Florida 50 Statutes, is repealed. 51 Reviserâs note.âThe cited subsection, which relates to extension 52 of the presale period for the Florida State Beekeepers 53 Association specialty license plate for an additional 12 54 months, expired pursuant to its own terms, effective July 55 1, 2025. 56 Section 8.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) and subsection 57 (5) of section 321.04, Florida Statutes, are repealed. 58 Reviserâs note.âParagraph (3)(b), which relates to assignment of 59 one or more patrol officers to the office of the Lieutenant 60 Governor for security services for the 2024-2025 fiscal 61 year only, and subsection (5), which relates to assignment 62 of a patrol officer to a Cabinet member under specified 63 circumstances for the 2024-2025 fiscal year, expired 64 pursuant to their own terms, effective July 1, 2025. 65 Section 9.âSubsection (4) of section 339.08, Florida 66 Statutes, is repealed. 67 Reviserâs note.âThe cited subsection, which relates to 68 appropriation of funds, for the 2023-2024 and 2024-2025 69 fiscal years only, to the State Transportation Trust Fund 70 from the General Revenue Fund and the Discretionary Sales 71 Surtax Clearing Trust Fund as provided in the General 72 Appropriations Act, expired pursuant to its own terms, 73 effective July 1, 2025. 74 Section 10.âSubsection (16) of section 455.213, Florida 75 Statutes, is repealed. 76 Reviserâs note.âThe cited subsection, which waives 50 percent of 77 the initial licensing fee for an applicant applying for an 78 initial license for a profession under chapter 455 for the 79 2023-2024 and 2024-2025 fiscal years, expired pursuant to 80 its own terms, effective July 1, 2025. 81 Section 11.âSubsection (8) of section 553.80, Florida 82 Statutes, is repealed. 83 Reviserâs note.âThe cited subsection, which prohibits raising 84 building inspection fees by local governments located in 85 areas designated by the Federal Emergency Management Agency 86 disaster declarations for Hurricane Ian or Hurricane Nicole 87 before October 1, 2024, expired pursuant to its own terms, 88 effective June 30, 2025. 89 Section 12.âSubsection (10) of section 1004.6495, Florida 90 Statutes, is repealed. 91 Reviserâs note.âThe cited subsection, which requires 92 establishment, no later than August 31, 2024, by the Board 93 of Governors and the State Board of Education, in 94 consultation with the Florida Center for Students with 95 Unique Abilities, of a state Classification of Instruction 96 Program code for Florida Postsecondary Comprehensive 97 Transition Programs established pursuant to the section, 98 expired pursuant to its own terms, effective July 1, 2025. 99 Section 13.âSubsection (14) of section 1008.22, Florida 100 Statutes, is repealed. 101 Reviserâs note.âThe cited subsection, which relates to an 102 independent review and recommendations relating to the 103 coordinated screening and progress monitoring system under 104 s. 1008.25(9), was repealed pursuant to its own terms, 105 effective July 1, 2025. 106 Section 14.âSubsection (7) of section 1008.34, Florida 107 Statutes, is repealed. 108 Reviserâs note.âThe cited subsection, which relates to providing 109 a transition and requirements for calculation of school and 110 district grades for the 2022-2023 school year, exempting 111 certain schools from specified provisions, and requirements 112 for determining grade 3 retention and high school 113 graduation for the school year, was repealed pursuant to 114 its own terms, effective July 1, 2025. 115 Section 15.âSubsection (7) of section 1008.341, Florida 116 Statutes, is repealed. 117 Reviserâs note.âThe cited subsection, which provides that school 118 improvement ratings will not be calculated for the 2022 119 2023 school year, and that the State Board of Education 120 shall set a specified scale of ratings pursuant to rule 121 upon the availability of learning gains data in the 2023 122 2024 school year, was repealed pursuant to its own terms, 123 effective July 1, 2025. 124 Section 16.âThis act shall take effect on the 60th day 125 after adjournment sine die of the session of the Legislature in 126 which enacted.